Hawaii statutes.
§657-23 Extension while criminal case is
pending. If at any time when any cause of action for recovery of
restitution or compensation for damage or injury to a victim of a crime exists,
a criminal action is pending which arises out of the same occurrence, the time
during which the criminal action is pending shall not be deemed or taken as any
part of the time limited for the commencement of the civil action.

As used in this section, a criminal action is
pending until the court's jurisdiction in the criminal action is terminated. [L
1986, c 225, §1; am L 1998, c 269, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next